Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.010

Definitions.

When used in this chapter, the following terms, words or phrases shall have the following meaning:

(1) "District" means any mosquito control district formed pursuant to this chapter.

(2) "Board" or "district board" means the board of trustees governing the district.

(3) "County commissioners" means the governing body of the county.

(4) "Unit" means all unincorporated territory in a proposed district in one county, regarded as an entity, or each city in a proposed district, likewise regarded as an entity.

(5) "Territory" means any city or county or portion of either or both city or county having a population of not less than one hundred persons.

(6) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal successor thereof.

[ 1957 c 153 s 1.]